Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 286A.035 is amended to read:
286A.035. (1) Each related agency shall report  the plans of the related agency for the issuance
of bonds during the  next biennium. The related agency shall submit the related agency’s report to
the Governor by a  date determined by the Governor and shall include in the report a description
of bonds that the related agency intends to retire or defease during the next biennium.
(2) On or before a date determined by the Governor, the  State Treasurer shall advise the Gov-
ernor on the prudent maximum amount of  bonds to be issued for each bond program. The State
Treasurer shall consider available economic and financial data in preparing advice to  be given to
the Governor.
(3) As part of the Governor’s budget described in ORS 291.216, the Governor shall:
(a) Consider the prudent maximum  amounts advised by the State Treasurer pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section to determine the Governor’s total recommended amount; and
(b) Recommend  to the Legislative Assembly the total amount of bonds the State Treasurer may
issue for each bond program for a biennium.
(4) The Legislative Assembly shall determine  the amount of bonds the State Treasurer may issue
for each state agency for a biennium. Except as  provided in subsection (5) of this section,  if the
Legislative Assembly fails to make  the determination described in this subsection by the first day
of the biennium, the unused  portion of the authorization the Legislative Assembly made for the
preceding biennium is deemed  to carry forward for the current biennium at the amount authorized
for the preceding biennium until the earlier of:
(a) The date on which  legislation authorizing the amount of bonds for the current biennium is
enacted;  or
(b) The date on which the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(5) The unused portion  of the amount of pass-through revenue bonds authorized for is-
suance in the preceding biennium is deemed to  carry forward for the current biennium until
the date on  which legislation authorizing the amount of pass-through revenue bonds for the
current biennium is enacted.
[(5)] (6) The amount of bonds that may be  issued under bond programs may be modified by the
Governor.  However,  the Governor may not modify the amount of bonds that may be issued under
bond programs  in a way that would cause the maximum amount established by the Legislative As-
sembly for a category of bond programs to be exceeded if the Legislative Assembly:
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-INTRO) Page 1
(a) Has categorized  the bonds that may be issued under bond programs as general obligation,
direct revenue and pass-through revenue bonds; and
(b) Assigned a maximum amount to each category.
[(6)] (7) This section applies to bonds:
(a) Unless the bonds are expressly exempted from the requirements of this section.
(b) Except refunding bonds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238.697 is amended to read:
238.697. (1) Before a public body, or an intergovernmental entity formed  pursuant to ORS
238.695, may authorize the issuance of bonds under ORS 238.694, the public body or intergovern-
mental entity must first:
(a) Obtain a statistically based assessment  from an independent economic or financial consulting
firm regarding the likelihood that investment returns on bond proceeds will exceed the interest cost
of the bonds under various market conditions; and
(b) Make a report available to the general public that:
(A) Describes the results of the assessment; and
(B) Discloses whether the public body or intergovernmental entity has retained the  services of
an independent SEC-registered advisor.
(2) The public body or intergovernmental  entity shall transmit the assessment to the State
Treasurer [ at least ] by the earlier of:
(a) 30 days before issuing the bonds[ .]; or
(b) Two days prior to the date the bonds are offered for sale to investors.
(3) The State Treasurer shall provide to  the State Debt Policy Advisory Commission an annual
report on bonds issued  under ORS 238.694. The report must describe each bond issuance under ORS
238.694 that took place on or after June 11, 2019, and that remains outstanding, including, for  each
issuance:
(a) The actual interest rate owed over the term of the bonds;
(b) The projected rate of return on the bond proceeds, as  determined by the assessment required
under subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) The  actual rate of return on the bond proceeds in the previous fiscal year and the cumulative
rate of return on the bond proceeds.
(4) As used in  this section, “independent SEC-registered advisor” has the meaning given the
term “independent registered municipal advisor” in 17 C.F.R. 240.15Ba1-1, as amended.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 352.402 is amended to read:
352.402. (1) A public university [ listed in ORS 352.002 ] may  elect to remain eligible to receive
proceeds of state bonds. If a public university requests the State Treasurer to issue state bonds for
the benefit of the university that are authorized under  Article XI-F(1) or XI-Q of the Oregon Con-
stitution or ORS 283.085 to 283.092, and the state bonds are intended to be repaid in whole  or in
part by university  revenues or other moneys under the control of the university, the [ State Treasurer
must review and approve  all plans to issue revenue bonds of the university and to execute other obli-
gations related to the revenue bonds. ]
[(2) The State Treasurer shall limit the scope of review and approval under  subsection (1) of this
section to consideration of periodic cash flow projections and other information  necessary to determine
the sufficiency of the cash flow of the public university listed in ORS 352.002 ] university may  not
issue revenue bonds pursuant to ORS 352.388 to 352.415 unless the  university first certifies
to the State Treasurer, in a form and manner required by the State Treasurer, the  suffi-
ciency of the university’s cash flow  to pay any loans from state agencies funded with the proceeds
of state bonds and to pay costs for:
(a) State bonds issued for the benefit of the  public university [ listed in ORS 352.002 ] pursuant
to Article XI-F(1) or XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution or ORS 283.085 to 283.092; and
(b) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to ORS 352.388 to 352.415.
(2) A public university must transmit the certification required under subsection (1)  of
this section to the State Treasurer by the earlier of:
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-INTRO) Page 2
(a) 30 days before issuing the bonds; or
(b) 10 days prior to the date the bonds are offered for sale to investors.
(3) A public university  [ listed in ORS 352.002 ] that issues revenue bonds of the university, or
executes other obligations related to the revenue bonds, without [ the approval of the State Treasurer
as provided in subsection (2) of this section ] making the  certification required under this section
is not eligible to receive proceeds of the state bonds described  in subsection (1) of this section [ and
that are intended to be repaid in whole or  in part by university revenues or other moneys under the
control of the university on or after August 14, 2013 ] after the effective date of this 2023 Act .
(4) As used in this  section, “public university” means a public university listed in ORS
352.002.
Passed by House March 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-INTRO) Page 3